anonim.aff
NAME Nevek szótövesítése
LANG hu_HU     
VERSION Magyar 1.2     
SET UTF-8     
FLAG UTF-8
COMPOUNDMIN 1     
COMPOUNDFLAG Y     
COMPOUNDFORBIDFLAG %     
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG @     
COMPOUNDSYLLABLE 6 aáeéiíoóöőuúüű       
SYLLABLENUM klmc     
     
# NOSUGGEST =     
KEEPCASE ?     
     
# obsoloted     
COMPOUNDFIRST v     
COMPOUNDLAST x     
ONLYROOT u     
#COMPOUNDWORD 2 y     
HU_KOTOHANGZO ?     
     
# new (> Hunspell-1.0-RC2)     
COMPOUNDBEGIN v     
COMPOUNDEND x     
NEEDAFFIX u     
ONLYINCOMPOUND |     
# 2. parameter only for back compatibility:     
COMPOUNDWORDMAX 2 y     
COMPOUNDROOT y     
     
CHECKCOMPOUNDDUP         
CHECKCOMPOUNDTRIPLE         
CHECKCOMPOUNDREP         
CHECKCOMPOUNDCASE         
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN 7        
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN ccs cs       
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN ggy gy       
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN lly ly       
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN nny ny       
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN ssz sz       
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN tty ty       
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN sz szerű       
     
FORBIDDENWORD w     
WORDCHARS -.§%°0123456789–€     
     
NOT_GENERATE &     
GENERATE (     
LEMMA_PRESENT )     

# CSALÁDi többesszám 
SFX Ö Y 5
SFX Ö 0 ék/RVT . +CSALÁD
SFX Ö o óék/RVT o +CSALÁD
SFX Ö e éék/RVT e +CSALÁD
SFX Ö a áék/RVT a +CSALÁD
SFX Ö ö őék/RVT ö +CSALÁD

# magas hangrend [eéiíüöűő]
# mély hangrend [eéoíaáuúoó]
# mássalhangzó [qwrtzpsdfghjklyxcvbnm]
SFX T Y 11
SFX T ö őt ö +TÁRGYRAG
SFX T o ót [^o]o +TÁRGYRAG
SFX T e ét e +TÁRGYRAG
SFX T a át a +TÁRGYRAG
SFX T 0 t oo +TÁRGYRAG
SFX T 0 t [áéiíóőuúüűhy-àø] +TÁRGYRAG
SFX T 0 t [ln]y +TÁRGYRAG
SFX T 0 t [qljnrzsy] +TÁRGYRAG
SFX T 0 ot [^aáeéiíóöőuúüűljnrzs] +TÁRGYRAG
SFX T 0 et [^aáeéiíóöőuúüűljnrzs] +TÁRGYRAG
SFX T 0 at [^aáeéiíóöőuúüűljnrzs] +TÁRGYRAG

SFX B Y 4     
SFX B o óé/TRV o +BIRTOK
SFX B ö őé/TRV ö +BIRTOK
SFX B a áé/TRV a +BIRTOK
SFX B 0 é/TRV . +BIRTOK

SFX N Y 1
SFX N 0 né/TRVÖB . +NEJ

# Ragozás nak nál nél ból ből...
SFX R Y 59
SFX R 0 től . +VKTŐL
SFX R 0 tól . +VKTŐL
SFX R o ótól o +VKTŐL
SFX R a ától a +VKTŐL
SFX R e étől e +VKTŐL
SFX R ö őtől ö +VKTŐL
SFX R 0 nél . +VKNÉL
SFX R 0 nál . +VKNÉL
SFX R o ónál o +VKNÉL
SFX R a ánál a +VKNÉL
SFX R e énél e +VKNÉL
SFX R ö őnél ö +VKNÉL
SFX R 0 hoz . +VKHEZ
SFX R 0 hez . +VKHEZ
SFX R 0 höz . +VKHEZ
SFX R o óhoz o +VKHEZ
SFX R a ához a +VKHEZ
SFX R e éhez e +VKHEZ
SFX R ö őhöz ö +VKHEZ
SFX R 0 nek . +VKNEK
SFX R 0 nak . +VKNEK
SFX R o ónak o +VKNEK
SFX R a ának a +VKNEK
SFX R e ének e +VKNEK
SFX R ö őnek ö +VKNEK
SFX R 0 ig [^oaeö] +VKIG
SFX R o óig o +VKIG
SFX R a áig a +VKIG
SFX R e éig e +VKIG
SFX R ö őig ö +VKIG
SFX R 0 ért [^oaeö] +VKÉRT
SFX R o óért o +VKÉRT
SFX R a áért a +VKÉRT
SFX R e éért e +VKÉRT
SFX R ö őért ö +VKÉRT
SFX R 0 ban . +VKBEN
SFX R 0 ben . +VKBEN
SFX R o óban o +VKBEN
SFX R a ában a +VKBEN
SFX R e ében e +VKBEN
SFX R ö őben ö +VKBEN
SFX R 0 ról . +VKRŐL
SFX R 0 ről . +VKRŐL
SFX R o óról o +VKRŐL
SFX R a áról a +VKRŐL
SFX R e éről e +VKRŐL
SFX R ö őről ö +VKRŐL
SFX R 0 ba . +VKBE
SFX R 0 be . +VKBE
SFX R o óba o +VKBE
SFX R a ába a +VKBE
SFX R e ébe e +VKBE
SFX R ö őbe ö +VKBE
SFX R 0 ból . +VKBŐL
SFX R 0 ből . +VKBŐL
SFX R o óból o +VKBŐL
SFX R a ából a +VKBŐL
SFX R e éből e +VKBŐL
SFX R ö őből ö +VKBŐL

# -val -vel
SFX V Y 175     
SFX V 0 vel . +VKVEL
SFX V 0 val . +VKVEL
SFX V o óval o +VKVEL
SFX V a ával a +VKVEL
SFX V e ével e +VKVEL
SFX V ö ővel ö +VKVEL
SFX V zs dzsé dzs +VKVEL
SFX V zs dzsel dzs +VKVEL
SFX V zs dzsal dzs +VKVEL
SFX V z szé [^s]sz +VKVEL
SFX V z szel [^s]sz +VKVEL
SFX V z szal [^s]sz +VKVEL
SFX V y tyé [^t]ty +VKVEL
SFX V y tyel [^t]ty +VKVEL
SFX V y tyal [^t]ty +VKVEL
SFX V y nyé [^n]ny +VKVEL
SFX V y nyel [^n]ny +VKVEL
SFX V y nyal [^n]ny +VKVEL
SFX V y lyé [^l]ly +VKVEL
SFX V y lyel [^l]ly +VKVEL
SFX V y lyal [^l]ly +VKVEL
SFX V y gyé [^g]gy +VKVEL
SFX V y gyel [^g]gy +VKVEL
SFX V y gyal [^g]gy +VKVEL
SFX V ty tyé tty +VKVEL
SFX V ty tyel tty +VKVEL
SFX V ty tyal tty +VKVEL
SFX V t té tt +VKVEL
SFX V t tel tt +VKVEL
SFX V t tal tt +VKVEL
SFX V sz szé ssz +VKVEL
SFX V sz szel ssz +VKVEL
SFX V sz szal ssz +VKVEL
SFX V s zsé [^d]zs +VKVEL
SFX V s zsel [^d]zs +VKVEL
SFX V s zsal [^d]zs +VKVEL
SFX V s sé ss +VKVEL
SFX V s sel ss +VKVEL
SFX V s sal ss +VKVEL
SFX V s csé [^c]cs +VKVEL
SFX V s csel [^c]cs +VKVEL
SFX V s csal [^c]cs +VKVEL
SFX V r ré rr +VKVEL
SFX V r rel rr +VKVEL
SFX V r ral rr +VKVEL
SFX V p pé pp +VKVEL
SFX V p pel pp +VKVEL
SFX V p pal pp +VKVEL
SFX V ny nyé nny +VKVEL
SFX V ny nyel nny +VKVEL
SFX V ny nyal nny +VKVEL
SFX V n né nn +VKVEL
SFX V n nel nn +VKVEL
SFX V n nal nn +VKVEL
SFX V m mé mm +VKVEL
SFX V m mel mm +VKVEL
SFX V m mal mm +VKVEL
SFX V ly lyé lly +VKVEL
SFX V ly lyel lly +VKVEL
SFX V ly lyal lly +VKVEL
SFX V l lé ll +VKVEL
SFX V l lel ll +VKVEL
SFX V l lal ll +VKVEL
SFX V k ké kk +VKVEL
SFX V k kel kk +VKVEL
SFX V k kal kk +VKVEL
SFX V j jé jj +VKVEL
SFX V j jel jj +VKVEL
SFX V j jal jj +VKVEL
SFX V gy gyé ggy +VKVEL
SFX V gy gyel ggy +VKVEL
SFX V gy gyal ggy +VKVEL
SFX V g gé gg +VKVEL
SFX V g gel gg +VKVEL
SFX V g gal gg +VKVEL
SFX V f fé ff +VKVEL
SFX V f fel ff +VKVEL
SFX V f fal ff +VKVEL
SFX V d dé dd +VKVEL
SFX V d del dd +VKVEL
SFX V d dal dd +VKVEL
SFX V cs csé ccs +VKVEL
SFX V cs csel ccs +VKVEL
SFX V cs csal ccs +VKVEL
SFX V c cé cc +VKVEL
SFX V c cel cc +VKVEL
SFX V c cal cc +VKVEL
SFX V b bé bb +VKVEL
SFX V b bel bb +VKVEL
SFX V b bal bb +VKVEL
SFX V 0 zé [^cts]z +VKVEL
SFX V 0 zé [^cts]Z- +VKVEL
SFX V 0 zel z +VKVEL
SFX V 0 zal z +VKVEL
SFX V 0 vé v +VKVEL
SFX V 0 vé h +VKVEL
SFX V 0 vel v +VKVEL
SFX V 0 val v +VKVEL
SFX V 0 vel h +VKVEL
SFX V 0 val h +VKVEL
SFX V 0 té th +VKVEL
SFX V 0 té [^t]t +VKVEL
SFX V 0 tel th +VKVEL
SFX V 0 tal th +VKVEL
SFX V 0 tel [^t]t +VKVEL
SFX V 0 tal [^t]t +VKVEL
SFX V 0 sé sh +VKVEL
SFX V 0 sé [^tczs]s +VKVEL
SFX V 0 sé [^t]sch +VKVEL
SFX V 0 szé x +VKVEL
SFX V 0 szel x +VKVEL
SFX V 0 szal x +VKVEL
SFX V 0 sel sh +VKVEL
SFX V 0 sal sh +VKVEL
SFX V 0 sel [^tczs]s +VKVEL
SFX V 0 sal [^tczs]s +VKVEL
SFX V 0 sel [^t]sch +VKVEL
SFX V 0 sal [^t]sch +VKVEL
SFX V 0 ré [^r]r +VKVEL
SFX V 0 rel [^r]r +VKVEL
SFX V 0 ral [^r]r +VKVEL
SFX V 0 pé [^p]p +VKVEL
SFX V 0 pel [^p]p +VKVEL
SFX V 0 pal [^p]p +VKVEL
SFX V 0 né [^n]n +VKVEL
SFX V 0 nel [^n]n +VKVEL
SFX V 0 nal [^n]n +VKVEL
SFX V 0 mé [^m]m +VKVEL
SFX V 0 mel [^m]m +VKVEL
SFX V 0 mal [^m]m +VKVEL
SFX V 0 lé [^l]l +VKVEL
SFX V 0 lel [^l]l +VKVEL
SFX V 0 lal [^l]l +VKVEL
SFX V 0 ké [^k]k +VKVEL
SFX V 0 kel [^k]k +VKVEL
SFX V 0 kal [^k]k +VKVEL
SFX V 0 jé [^j]j +VKVEL
SFX V 0 jé [^glnt]y +VKVEL
SFX V 0 jel [^j]j +VKVEL
SFX V 0 jal [^j]j +VKVEL
SFX V 0 jel [^glnt]y +VKVEL
SFX V 0 jal [^glnt]y +VKVEL
SFX V 0 hé [^s]ch +VKVEL
SFX V 0 hé [^ctgsáeéuü]h +VKVEL
SFX V 0 hel [^s]ch +VKVEL
SFX V 0 hal [^s]ch +VKVEL
SFX V 0 hel h +VKVEL
SFX V 0 hal h +VKVEL
SFX V 0 gé gh +VKVEL
SFX V 0 gé [^g]g +VKVEL
SFX V 0 gel gh +VKVEL
SFX V 0 gal gh +VKVEL
SFX V 0 gel [^g]g +VKVEL
SFX V 0 gal [^g]g +VKVEL
SFX V 0 fé [^f]f +VKVEL
SFX V 0 fel [^f]f +VKVEL
SFX V 0 fal [^f]f +VKVEL
SFX V 0 dé [^d]d +VKVEL
SFX V 0 del [^d]d +VKVEL
SFX V 0 dal [^d]d +VKVEL
SFX V 0 cé [ct]z +VKVEL
SFX V 0 cé [^c]c +VKVEL
SFX V 0 csé tsch +VKVEL
SFX V 0 csé ts +VKVEL
SFX V 0 csel tsch +VKVEL
SFX V 0 csal tsch +VKVEL
SFX V 0 csel ts +VKVEL
SFX V 0 csal ts +VKVEL
SFX V 0 cel [ct]z +VKVEL
SFX V 0 cal [ct]z +VKVEL
SFX V 0 cel [^c]c +VKVEL
SFX V 0 cal [^c]c +VKVEL
SFX V 0 bé [^b]b +VKVEL
SFX V 0 bel [^b]b +VKVEL
SFX V 0 bal [^b]b +VKVEL
